South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-13-25(L) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (L) The provisions of this section do not apply to presidential preference primaries held pursuant to Section 7-11-20. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----